Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB440.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 449.3. Prohibition on Medical Assistance Managed Care Payment for Provider-Preventable Conditions.--(a) A medical assistance managed care organization may not pay for provider-preventable conditions.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Medical assistance managed care organization" means a Medicaid managed care organization as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(m)(1)(A) (relating to payment to states) that is a party to a Medicaid managed care agreement with the department to 1234567891011121314151617181920 provide physical or behavioral health services on a capitated basis."Provider-preventable conditions" shall:(1) Include the term as defined in 42 CFR 447.26 (relating to prohibition on payment for provider-preventable conditions).(2) Mean any conditions occurring in a health care setting that meet the following criteria:(i) is identified in the State plan in line with the fee-for-service program;(ii) has been found by the Commonwealth, based upon a review of medical literature by qualified professionals, to be reasonably preventable through the application of procedures supported by evidence-based guidelines;(iii) has a negative consequence for the patient;(iv) is auditable; and(v) includes, at a minimum, any of the following:(A) a wrong surgical or other invasive procedure performed on a patient;(B) a surgical or other invasive procedure performed on the wrong body part; or(C) a surgical or other invasive procedure performed on the wrong patient.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0440PN0409 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223